Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5601
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-5601 to 44-5613 shall be known and may be cited as the Reinsurance Intermediary Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 55;

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 38.